Utah statutes.
62A-11-704.   Mandatory distribution to obligee through electronic funds
transfer.
(1)  Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the office
shall, except as provided in Subsection (3), distribute child support
payments, under Subsection 62A-11-413(2) or Section 62A-11-505, by electronic
funds transfer.
(2)  Distribution of child support payments by electronic payment under this
section shall be made to:
(a)  an account of the obligee; or
(b)  an account that may be accessed by the obligee through the use of an
electronic access card.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), the office may make rules, pursuant to
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to allow exceptions
to the requirement to make distributions by electronic funds transfer under
Subsection (1).
(b)  The rules described in Subsection (3)(a) may only allow exceptions under
circumstances where:
(i)  requiring distribution by electronic funds transfer would result in an
undue hardship to the office or a person; or
(ii)  it is not likely that distribution will be made to the obligee on a
recurring basis.
